Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 SF 2439 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb S.F. 2439 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 103A.8E Fire protection sprinkler 1 systems. 2 1. a. The commissioner shall adopt as part of the state 3 building code a prohibition on the required installation of 4 a fire protection sprinkler system in a series of attached 5 single-family residences consisting of eighteen thousand square 6 feet or less. 7 b. A local building regulation shall not require the 8 installation of a fire protection sprinkler system in a series 9 of attached single-family residences consisting of eighteen 10 thousand square feet or less. 11 2. a. The commissioner shall adopt as part of the state 12 building code a prohibition on the required installation of a 13 fire protection sprinkler system in a detached single-family 14 residence consisting of six thousand five hundred square feet 15 or less. 16 b. A local building regulation shall not require the 17 installation of a fire protection sprinkler system in a 18 detached single-family residence consisting of six thousand 19 five hundred square feet or less. 20 -1- SF 2439 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb 1/ 1